Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-465
Cruelty; maltreatment.

Any person subject to this code who is guilty of cruelty toward or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to his orders shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 65, p. 1577.